Massachusetts, session 194th, H2559.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 70E of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (o) the following subsection:-
(p) to a person of their choosing to serve as a support person. The support person may be
present with the patient 24 hours a day in patient-accessible areas of the health care facility or
provider’s office to accompany the patient while the patient is receiving inpatient or outpatient
treatment or is consulting with their health care provider. A health care facility may temporarily
restrict the presence of the support person during surgeries or emergency interventions. Health
care facilities shall not require the support person to receive any vaccination as a condition for
access to the patient.
of 1